Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB205.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 117.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The county board of elections shall in the manner prescribed by this section,
not later than March 20 each year, except in a year in which no primary and
regular elections are scheduled, appoint for each precinct in the county two
(2) judges, one (1) clerk and one (1) sheriff of election. They shall serve in all
elections held in the county during the year, except for minors seventeen (17)
years of age who will become eighteen (18) years of age on or before the day
of the regular election who may only serve as election officers for the primary
and regular elections as provided in subsection (9) of this section.
(b) If a special election is ordered to be held in a year in which no elections are
scheduled, the county executive committee of each political party in each
county in the territory affected by the special election shall, not later than
twenty-eight (28) days preceding the date of the special election, submit a
written list of nominees for precinct election officers to serve in the special
election in a manner consistent with the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section. The county board of elections in each county in the territory affected
by the special election shall, not later than twenty-one (21) days preceding the
date of the special election, appoint precinct election officers to serve in the
special election in a manner consistent with the provisions of subsections (4),
(5), and (6) of this section.
(c) The State Board of Elections shall promulgate an administrative regulation
under KRS Chapter 13A establishing evaluation procedures which county
boards of elections may use to qualify persons nominated to serve as precinct
election officers.
(2) The county executive committees of the two (2) political parties having
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 2/16/2026 2:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2183
representation on the State Board of Elections may, on or before March 15 each
year, designate in writing to the county board of elections a list of not less than four
(4) names for each precinct; except that, in any precinct where there are not as
many as four (4) persons possessing the qualifications of an election officer
belonging to the political party filing the list, or when the State Board of Elections
has approved a county board of elections' precinct consolidation plan requesting a
lesser number of precinct officers, a lesser number may be designated. If there are
two (2) or more contending executive committees of the same party in any county,
the one recognized by the written certificate of the chair of the state central
committee of the party shall be the one authorized to submit the lists. The lists shall
contain the full name, address, phone number, and Social Security number, if
available, of each person listed. The lists shall be accompanied by a signed
statement from each person stating that he or she is willing to serve, has not failed
to serve without excuse in the past, and has not been convicted of an election law
offense or any felony, unless the person's civil rights have been restored by the
Governor. The State Board of Elections shall prescribe the form of the list by
administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.
(3) The Attorney General shall notify each party state central committee of the duties
of the party.
(4) (a) If lists are submitted by the county executive committees under subsection (2)
of this section, the county board of elections shall select one (1) judge at each
voting place from each political party's list, and the county board shall select
the sheriff from one (1) political party's list and the clerk from the other.
(b) If no lists are submitted by the county executive committees under subsection
(2) of this section, the two (2) members of the county board of elections who
are appointed by the State Board of Elections may submit lists; and the county
board of elections shall select the sheriff and one (1) judge from one (1) list
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 2/16/2026 2:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2183
and the clerk and the other judge from the remaining list.
(c) If no lists are submitted by the county executive committees under subsection
(2) of this section, or by the county board of elections under paragraph (b) of
this subsection, the county clerk shall select the sheriff and one (1) judge from
the membership of one (1) party and the clerk and the other judge from the
membership of the remaining party. If no members of one (1) of the two (2)
political parties are available or willing to serve as a judge, the county clerk
shall select any qualified and registered voter within the county to serve as a
judge at a voting place.
(d) The county board of elections shall, when possible, also appoint an adequate
number of alternate precinct election officers from names on the lists which
were submitted but which were not selected by the county board as precinct
election officers. If alternate precinct election officers are not appointed from
the lists of nominees who were not selected as precinct election officers, the
county board of elections shall submit its method of selecting alternate
precinct election officers to the State Board of Elections for its approval. If no
lists are submitted to the county board of elections as provided in this
subsection, the county clerk shall select an adequate number of alternate
precinct election officers.
(e) The names of all precinct election officers and alternate precinct election
officers selected by the county clerk shall be submitted to the county board of
elections for its approval.
(f) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the selection of any registered and
qualified voter who is not registered with either of the two (2) political parties
to serve as a precinct election officer in a precinct in which the officer resides
or as otherwise provided in this subsection.
(5) If, after all reasonable efforts have been made, neither the county board of elections
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 2/16/2026 2:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2183
nor the county clerk are able to find two (2) qualified officers for each precinct who
are affiliated with the two (2) political parties having representation on the State
Board of Elections or any other qualified and registered voter within the county, the
county board of elections shall submit a list of emergency election officer
appointments to the State Board of Elections. The county board of elections shall
also present, in writing, its efforts to recruit and appoint election officers as
prescribed in subsection (4) of this section. The State Board of Elections, after its
review, may approve any or all of the emergency appointments submitted by the
county board of elections or may direct the county board to take other action. Any
emergency appointment shall be made for the next ensuing election only.
(6) In addition to precinct election officers appointed under subsection (1) of this
section, a county board of elections or the county clerk may appoint up to two (2)
additional precinct election officers per precinct with the approval of the State
Board of Elections. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate an administrative
regulation under KRS Chapter 13A establishing conditions under which additional
precinct officers may be approved.
(7) The county board of elections shall, not less than ten (10) days before the next
ensuing election, send to each election officer written notice of his or her
appointment. The county board of elections may direct the sheriff of the county to
serve the notice of appointment, if it deems the action is necessary.
(8) The State Board of Elections may require the county board of elections to submit its
list of precinct officers for review. The State Board of Elections may, after a
hearing, direct the removal of any election officer who the board finds would not
fairly administer the state election laws. The State Board of Elections shall provide
for the method and manner of the hearing by administrative regulation promulgated
under KRS Chapter 13A, and shall replace any officer so removed.
(9) (a) An election officer shall be a qualified voter of the precinct; except that,
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 2/16/2026 2:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2183
where no qualified voter of the required political party is available within the
precinct, the election officer shall be a qualified voter of the county.
(b) A minor seventeen (17) years of age who will become eighteen (18) years of
age on or before the day of the regular election may serve as an election
officer for the primary and regular elections in which he or she is qualified to
vote; however, no precinct shall have more than one (1) person serving as an
election officer who is a minor seventeen (17) years of age.
(c) An election officer shall not be a candidate for office during the election year.
(d) An election officer shall not be the spouse, parent, brother, sister, or child of a
candidate who is to be voted for at the election in the precinct in which the
election officer will serve on election day.
(e) An election officer shall not have changed his or her voter registration party
affiliation after December 31 immediately preceding his or her appointment to
serve for the primary, or after the second Tuesday in August to serve for the
regular election.
(f) An election officer may be removed, for cause, at any time up to five (5) days
before an election. Vacancies shall be filled by the county board of elections
or the county clerk with alternate precinct election officers and if the vacancy
occurs in the appointment of a judge, the person appointed to fill the vacancy
shall be of the same political affiliation as the vacating officer, except for
emergency appointments made as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(10) If the county board of elections or the county clerk fails to appoint election officers,
or if any officer is not present at the precinct at the time for commencing the
election, or refuses to act, and if no alternate is available, the officer in attendance
representing the political party of the absentee shall appoint a suitable person to act
in his or her place for that election. If both representatives of the same political
party are absent, qualified voters present affiliating with that party shall elect, viva
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 2/16/2026 2:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2183
voce, suitable persons to act in their places.
(11) Each election officer shall be paid a minimum of one hundred twenty[sixty] dollars
($120)[($60)] per election day served, and such an additional amount as
compensation as may be determined by the county board of elections, with the
approval of the governing body which would be responsible for funding the election
officers' pay, for each election in which the election officer serves, to be paid by the
county. For delivering the election packets to the polls, the precinct election officers
shall additionally receive the mileage reimbursement provided for state employees,
for each mile necessarily traveled in the delivery of the packets to the polls, or a flat
fee if the fee equals or exceeds that amount. For delivering election returns, the
precinct election judges shall additionally receive the mileage reimbursement
provided for state employees for each mile necessarily traveled in the delivery of
election returns, or a flat fee if the fee equals or exceeds that amount. The fee paid
to the precinct election judges for delivering election returns shall be paid by the
county.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 2/16/2026 2:55 PM Jacketed